Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 2. Transportation of Explosives.

Cross references. —

For regulation of explosives by the Department of Public Safety, see AS

18.70.080

.

Sec. 42.30.060.
Prohibition of explosives on vessels or vehicles carrying passengers.

A person may not transport, carry, or convey dynamite, gunpowder, nitroglycerine, naphtha, benzine, gasoline, crude or refined petroleum, or similar explosive burning fluid, or similar dangerous article on a vessel or vehicle operating in the state, or on the waters of the state, when the vessel or vehicle is carrying passengers for hire. Refined petroleum may be carried on a vessel or vehicle if it is put in good iron-bound casks, barrels, or boxes, in metallic cans, or vessels carefully packed in boxes and if it will not ignite at a temperature of less than 110 degrees Fahrenheit. Each cask, barrel, or box shall be plainly marked upon its head with the name of the manufacturer, the name of the article, and the temperature at which it will ignite.
The empty containers in which the refined oil is carried may be returned to the place of shipment by the vessel or vehicle which transported it.

History.

(§ 49-4-1 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 42.30.070.
Marking packages containing explosives.

The contents of every package containing an explosive or other dangerous article when presented to the master, conductor, or proprietor of a vessel or vehicle for shipment shall be plainly marked on the outside.
A person may not deliver, or have delivered, to a vessel or vehicle engaged in commerce by land or water in the state, or carry upon the vessel or vehicle, an explosive or other dangerous article under false or deceptive marking, description, invoice, shipping order, or other declaration, or without informing the agent of the carrier of its character at or before the time delivery or carriage is made.

History.

(§ 49-4-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 42.30.080.
Penalty for violation.

A person who knowingly violates AS

42.30.060

or

42.30.070

is guilty of a misdemeanor, and is punishable by a fine of not more than $2,000, or by imprisonment for not more than 18 months, or by both.

History.

(§ 49-4-2 ACLA 1949)

Sec. 42.30.090.
Penalty for violation causing death or injury.

When death or bodily injury is caused by the explosion of an article referred to in AS

42.30.060

—

42.30.100

while it is being placed on a vessel or vehicle for transportation in violation of AS

42.30.060

—

42.30.100

, or while it is being transported or removed from a vessel or vehicle, the person knowingly placing, or aiding, or permitting the placing of the article upon the vessel or vehicle, upon conviction, is punishable by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than 10 years.

History.

(§ 49-4-3 ACLA 1949; am § 39 ch 43 SLA 1964)

Cross references. —

For other crimes related to transportation or possession of explosives, see AS

11.61.200

and

11.61.240

.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Section inapplicable to offense committed before October 1, 1964. 1964 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

Sec. 42.30.100.
Transportation of motor fuel not prohibited.

Nothing in AS

42.30.060

—

42.30.090

prohibits the transportation of gasoline or petroleum products on a motorboat or vessel for use as a source of motive power on the motorboat or vessel.

History.

(§ 49-4-4 ACLA 1949)